Mississippi, session 2026, HB4009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-65-22, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-65-22.  (1)  Upon every person engaging or continuing in any amusement business or activity, which shall include all manner and forms of entertainment and amusement, all forms of diversion, sport, recreation or pastime, shows, exhibitions, contests, displays, games or any other and all methods of obtaining admission charges, donations, contributions or monetary charges of any character, from the general public or a limited or selected number thereof, directly or indirectly in return for other than tangible property or specific personal or professional services, whether such amusement is held or conducted in a public or private building, hotel, tent, pavilion, lot or resort, enclosed or in the open, there is hereby levied, assessed and shall be collected a tax equal to seven percent (7%) of the gross income received as admission, except as otherwise provided herein.  In lieu of the rate set forth above, there is hereby imposed, levied and assessed, to be collected as hereinafter provided, a tax of three percent (3%) of gross revenue derived from sales of admission to publicly owned enclosed coliseums and auditoriums (except admissions to athletic contests between colleges and universities).  There is hereby imposed, levied and assessed a tax of seven percent (7%) of gross revenue derived from sales of admission to events conducted on property managed by the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium, which tax shall be administered in the manner prescribed in this chapter, subject, however, to the provisions of Sections 55-23-3 through 55-23-11. (2)  The operator of any place of amusement in this state shall collect the tax imposed by this section, in addition to the price charged for admission to any place of amusement, and under all circumstances the person conducting the amusement shall be liable for, and pay the tax imposed based upon the actual charge for such admission.  Where permits are obtained for conducting temporary amusements by persons who are not the owners, lessees or custodians of the buildings, lots or places where the amusements are to be conducted, or where such temporary amusement is permitted by the owner, lessee or custodian of any place to be conducted without the procurement of a permit as required by this chapter, the tax imposed by this chapter shall be paid by the owner, lessee or custodian of such place where such temporary amusement is held or conducted, unless paid by the person conducting the amusement, and the applicant for such temporary permit shall furnish with the application therefor, the name and address of the owner, lessee or custodian of the premises upon which such amusement is to be conducted, and such owner, lessee or custodian shall be notified by the commission of the issuance of such permit, and of the joint liability for such tax. (3)  The tax imposed by this section shall not be levied or collected upon: (a)  Any admissions charged at any place of amusement operated by a religious, charitable or educational organization, or by a nonprofit civic club or fraternal organization (i) when the net proceeds of such admissions do not inure to any one or more individuals within such organization and are to be used solely for religious, charitable, educational or civic purposes; or (ii) when the entire net proceeds are used to defray the normal operating expenses of such organization, such as loan payments, maintenance costs, repairs and other operating expenses; (b)  Any admissions charged to hear gospel singing when promoted by a duly constituted local, bona fide nonprofit charitable or religious organization, irrespective of the fact that the performers and promoters are paid out of the proceeds of admissions collected, provided the program is composed entirely of gospel singing and not generally mixed with hillbilly or popular singing; (c)  Any admissions charged at any athletic games or contests between universities or colleges, between high schools or between grammar schools; (d)  Any admissions or tickets to or for baseball games between teams operated under a professional league franchise; (e)  Any admissions to county, state or community fairs, or any admissions to entertainments presented in community homes or houses which are publicly owned and controlled, and the proceeds of which do not inure to any individual or individuals; (f)  Any admissions or tickets to organized garden pilgrimages and to antebellum and historic houses when sponsored by an organized civic or garden club; (g)  Any admissions to any golf tournament held under the auspices of the Professional Golf Association or United States Golf Association wherein touring professionals compete, if such tournament is sponsored by a nonprofit association incorporated under the laws of the State of Mississippi where no dividends are declared and the proceeds do not inure to any individual or group; (h)  Any admissions to * * * university or community college conference, state, regional or national playoffs or championships; (i)  Any admissions or fees charged by any county or municipally owned and operated swimming pools, golf courses and tennis courts other than sales or rental of tangible personal property; (j)  Any admissions charged for the performance of symphony orchestras, operas, vocal or instrumental artists in which professional or amateur performers are compensated out of the proceeds of such admissions, when sponsored by local music or charity associations, or amateur dramatic performances or professional dramatic productions when sponsored by a children's dramatic association, where no dividends are declared, profits received, nor any salary or compensation paid to any of the members of such associations, or to any person for procuring or producing such performance; (k)  Any admissions or tickets to or for hockey games between teams operated under a professional league franchise; (l)  Any admissions or tickets to or for events sanctioned by the Mississippi Athletic Commission that are held within publicly owned enclosed coliseums and auditoriums; (m)  Guided tours on any navigable waters of this state, which include providing accommodations, guide services and/or related equipment operated by or under the direction of the person providing the tour, for the purposes of outdoor tourism; (n)  Any admissions to events held solely for religious or charitable purposes at livestock facilities, agriculture facilities or other facilities constructed, renovated or expanded with funds from the grant program authorized under Section 18 of Chapter 530, Laws of 1995; and (o)  (i)  Any admissions charged at events, activities or entertainments: 1.  Which are open to the public and held in or on parks, lands or buildings which are publicly owned, leased, used and/or controlled by a municipality, or any agency thereof; 2.  Which are created and sponsored by the municipality, or an agency thereof; and 3.  The proceeds of which do not inure to the benefit of any individual or individuals; however, (ii)  The governing authorities of a municipality may require the tax imposed by this section to be levied and collected at events, activities or entertainments described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph by: 1.  Adopting an ordinance requiring the levy and collection of the tax; 2.  Providing the Department of Revenue with a certified copy of the ordinance requiring the tax to be levied and assessed at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of the ordinance; (iii)  If the ordinance described in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph is repealed, the municipality shall provide the Department of Revenue with a certified copy of the repeal of the ordinance at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of the repeal. SECTION 2.  Nothing in this act shall affect or defeat any claim, assessment, appeal, suit, right or cause of action for taxes due or accrued under the sales tax laws before the date on which this act becomes effective, whether such claims, assessments, appeals, suits or actions have been begun before the date on which this act becomes effective or are begun thereafter; and the provisions of the sales tax laws are expressly continued in full force, effect and operation for the purpose of the assessment, collection and enrollment of liens for any taxes due or accrued and the execution of any warrant under such laws before the date on which this act becomes effective, and for the imposition of any penalties, forfeitures or claims for failure to comply with such laws. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.